Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1095
Eminent domain; power of district to exercise.

Every school district shall have power to exercise the right of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1921, c. 51, § 1, p. 222;

C.S.1922, § 6486;

C.S.1929, § 79-1701;

R.S.1943, § 79-1701;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 145, p. 742;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 119, p. 503;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,107;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 741.

A school district has the power of eminent domain, and the only legislative restrictions limit the school site to fifty acres, and public parks and fairgrounds may not be condemned. Father Flanagan's Boys' Home v. Millard School Dist., 196 Neb. 299, 242 N.W.2d 637 (1976).